Georgia, session 2025_26, HB147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to state government, is amended
in Chapter 25, relating to the Georgia Technology Authority, by revising paragraphs (31)
through (33) of subsection (a) of Code Section 50-25-4, relating to general powers, as
follows:
"(31) To coordinate the establishment and administration of one or more programs to
increase economic, educational, and social opportunities for citizens and businesses
- 1 -

LC 56 0397S
through the promotion of the deployment of broadband services and other emerging
communications technologies throughout the state and to exercise any power granted to
the authority in Chapter 40 of this title; and
(32) To establish model policies and procedures for all government entities in this state
for the development, procurement, implementation, utilization, data management, public
disclosure, and ongoing assessment of systems that employ artificial intelligence and
provide for the receipt and public disclosure of artificial intelligence inventories for all
government entities in this state; and
(33) To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers conferred by this
chapter."
SECTION 2.
Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 50-25-7.9, which is reserved, as
follows:
"50-25-7.9.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Artificial intelligence system' or 'AI system' means an engineered or machine based
system that emulates the capability of a person to receive audio, visual, text, or any other
form of information and use the information received to emulate a human cognitive
process, including, but not limited to, learning, generalizing, reasoning, planning,
predicting, acting, or communicating; provided, however, that artificial intelligence
systems may vary in the forms of information they can receive and in the human
cognitive processes they can emulate.
(2) 'Government entity' means any department, agency, board, bureau, commission,
authority, county, municipal corporation, school system, or other political subdivision of
this state.
(b) The authority shall:
- 2 -

LC 56 0397S
(1) Not later than December 31, 2025, and annually thereafter, conduct an inventory of
all systems that employ artificial intelligence and are in use by any department or agency
and publish such inventory on a publicly accessible website. Each inventory shall
include, but not be limited to, the following information for each AI system:
(A) The name of the system and the vendor, if any, that provided such system;
(B) A description of the general capabilities and uses of such system;
(C) The manner in which such system is able to be used to independently make,
inform, or materially support a conclusion, decision, or judgment; and
(D) The manner in which such system underwent an impact assessment prior to
implementation;
(2) Not later than December 31, 2026, develop a set of model policies and procedures
concerning the development, procurement, implementation, utilization, data management,
public disclosure, and ongoing assessment of systems that employ artificial intelligence
for use at the discretion of government entities; and
(3) Not later than December 31, 2027, and annually thereafter, receive from all
government entities inventory information of all systems that employ artificial
intelligence by such government entities and publish such inventory on a publicly
accessible website. Each such inventory shall include, but not be limited to:
(A) The name of the AI system and the vendor, if any, that provided such system;
(B) A description of the general capabilities and uses of such system;
(C) The manner in which such system is able to be used to independently make,
inform, or materially support a conclusion, decision, or judgment; and
(D) The manner in which such system underwent an impact assessment prior to
implementation. To the extent a system is provided pursuant to a contract, this
subparagraph shall only apply to systems provided pursuant to contracts entered into
or renewed after July 1, 2025.
- 3 -

LC 56 0397S
(d) All government entities shall cooperate with the authority in the administration of this
Code section. Reserved."
SECTION 3.
Said title is further amended in Chapter 1, relating to general provisions, by adding a new
Code section to read as follows:
"50-1-14.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Private activity bond' shall have the same meaning as set forth in 26 U.S.C. Section
141 of the Internal Revenue Code. Such term shall not include bonds, notes, or
obligations subject to the volume cap under 26 U.S.C. Section 146 of the Internal
Revenue Code or bonds as defined in Code Section 36-82-182.
(2) 'State charter school facility' means real property, personal property, or both, used or
intended for use in connection with the operation of a state charter school, as such term
is defined in paragraph (5) of Code Section 20-2-2081.
(b) The Attorney General is designated as an applicable elected representative, as provided
for in 26 U.S.C. Section 147(f)(2)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code, who may approve the
issuance of one or more private activity bonds to finance or refinance a state charter school
facility after a public hearing following reasonable notice in accordance with 26 U.S.C.
Section 147(f) of the Internal Revenue Code and applicable state and federal laws and
regulations. Within 60 days of receipt by the Attorney General of a written request for a
public hearing by a charter petitioner, the Attorney General or his or her designee shall
hold such public hearing following notice as required by 26 U.S.C. Section 147(f) of the
Internal Revenue Code. Within 30 days of holding such public hearing, the Attorney
General shall approve the issuance of such private activity bonds to finance or refinance
a state charter school facility if the applicable charter school is authorized by Article 31A
of Chapter 2 of Title 20, the applicable charter petitioner that is a party to the charter for
- 4 -

LC 56 0397S
such state charter school is an organization described under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c)(3)
of the Internal Revenue Code, and such state charter school facility that is or will be
financed or refinanced by such private activity bonds is or will be owned or principally
used by such state charter school."
SECTION 4.
100 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 5 -